Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8212
Credit for reserves ceded to reinsurer.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any captive insurer authorized to do business in this state may take credit for reserves on risks ceded to a reinsurer pursuant to the provisions of sections 44-416.05 to 44-416.10 and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such sections.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, any captive insurer may cede risks to a reinsurer not meeting the standards of sections 44-416.05 to 44-416.10 and may take reserve credits if the captive insurer receives prior written approval from the director.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 46.